Utah statutes.
78B-1-146.   Witnesses -- Interpreters -- Subpoena -- Contempt -- Costs.

(1)  When a witness does not understand and speak the English language, an interpreter shall be sworn in to interpret.  Any person may be subpoenaed by any court or judge to appear before the court or judge to act as an interpreter in any action or proceeding.  Any person so subpoenaed who fails to attend at the time and place named is guilty of a contempt.

(2)  The Judicial Council may establish a fee for the issuance and renewal of a license of a certified court interpreter.  Any fee established under this section shall be deposited as a dedicated credit to the Judicial Council.

(3)  If the court appoints an interpreter, the court may assess all or part of the fees and costs of the interpreter against the person for whom the service is provided.  The court may not assess interpreter fees or costs against a person found to be impecunious.



Amended by Chapter 391, 2010 General Session

